Mississippi, session 2026, HB920.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. With the approval of the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, the real property and structural improvements situated thereon, located upon the campus of Alcorn State University, designated for use as the residential dwelling of the university's president shall be classified as residential and not as a commercial property, for purposes of allowing any corporation, partnership or individual licensed under Chapter 59, Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972, as a residential builder to procure contracts for residential construction or residential improvements, as defined in Section 73-59-1, upon such real property of the university, notwithstanding the limitations on height and square footage parameters of the residential dwelling's floorplan stipulated in Section 73-59-19. SECTION 2.  Section 73-59-1, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-59-1.  For the purposes of this chapter, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein: (a)  "Board" means the State Board of Contractors created in Section 31-3-3, Mississippi Code of 1972. (b)  "Residential builder" means any corporation, partnership or individual who constructs a building or structure for sale for use by another as a residence or who, for a fixed price, commission, fee, wage or other compensation, undertakes or offers to undertake the construction, or superintending of the construction, of any building or structure which is not more than three (3) floors in height, to be used by another as a residence, when the total cost of the undertaking exceeds Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), except as otherwise provided under Section 1 of this act. (c) "Remodeler" means any corporation, partnership or individual who, for a fixed price, commission, fee, wage or other compensation, undertakes or offers to undertake the construction, or superintending of the construction, of improvements to an existing residence when the total cost of the improvements exceeds Ten Thousand Dollars ($10,000.00). (d)  "Residential construction" means any undertaking described in paragraph (b) of this section performed by a residential builder. (e)  "Residential improvement" means any undertaking described in paragraph (c) of this section performed by a remodeler. (f)  "Active licensee" means any builder or remodeler licensed under this chapter and engaged in building and remodeling. (g)  "Inactive licensee" means any builder or remodeler licensed under this chapter and not engaged in building or remodeling. (h)  "Construction manager" means any person or entity, other than a residential builder, remodeler or owner, who has a contract or agreement with the owner of the property for residential construction or residential improvement, no matter if that owner himself is the general contractor or a holder of a building permit. (i)  "Residential solar contractor" means any person or entity who installs, modifies, maintains, and repairs thermal and photovoltaic solar energy systems. SECTION 3.  Section 73-59-19, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 73-59-19.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 1 of this act, any residential builder licensed pursuant to the provisions of this chapter may, without being required to obtain an additional license under any other law of this state, construct, improve, repair, remodel or renovate any commercial structure, provided the prescribed contract job does not exceed seven thousand five hundred (7,500) square feet. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.